Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 9 Biological Products

4-9-1.
Products to be labeled.

All biological products as defined under the Virus-Serum-Toxin Act 21 USC 151-159 et seq., used for the testing or immunizing of animals sold, given away, or used within the state, shall bear a label stating the name and address of the person, firm, or institution making it and the date of its expiration, and comply with all other provisions of the Virus-Serum-Toxin Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 151-159 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-1

; P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 46.

4-9-2.
Authorization for distribution of products sold or given away.

Only products listed in §

4-9-1

and those that are either conditionally or unconditionally licensed by the center for veterinary biologics of the United States department of agriculture are eligible for distribution in the state. All persons other than duly licensed veterinarians intending to sell or give away any of the products listed in §

4-9-1

shall notify, in writing, the director of the department of environmental management of their intent to sell or give away products enumerated in § 4-9-1. No later than ten (10) business days after receipt of the notification, the director of the department of environmental management shall provide a written response either authorizing or denying the sale or give away of the products identified in the notification. No person other than duly licensed veterinarians may sell or give away any of the products listed in § 4-9-1 until they have received written authorization by the director of the department of environmental management that they are allowed to sell or give away said products and that they are limited to selling and giving away said product in the manner in which the director approves, including, but not limited to, restrictions or conditions on the distribution, sale or use of the authorized product(s).

Failure to obtain written authorization from the director prior to selling or giving away products enumerated in §

4-9-1

shall constitute a violation of this section. Failure to comply with the restrictions or conditions imposed by the director pursuant to subsection

4-9-2(a)

shall constitute a violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-2

; P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 1.

4-9-3.
Use and disposition of products — Records and reports.

The director of the department of environmental management may, as a condition of authorization provided in subsection

4-9-2(a)

, require records to be kept by persons that sell or give away any of the products enumerated in §

4-9-1

. Such records may include, but not be limited to, the product trade name, the product generic name, the name and address of the company that produced the product, the USDA product code, the strength of the product, the date the product was produced, the date the product was delivered, the date the product was administered, the product serial number or lot number, the name and address of the owner of the animal(s) that the product was administered, sold, or given away to, and the individual identification of any animal(s) that the product was administered to or used on.

Failure to keep records required by the director under this section shall constitute a violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-3

; P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 1.

4-9-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-4

; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 2, effective July 11, 2013; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 2, effective July 11, 2013.

4-9-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-5

; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 2, effective July 11, 2013; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 2, effective July 11, 2013.

4-9-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-6

; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 2, effective July 11, 2013; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 2, effective July 11, 2013.

4-9-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-7

; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 2, effective July 11, 2013; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 2, effective July 11, 2013.

4-9-8.
Treatment of animals to prevent normal reaction to tests — Sale or removal of reactors.

No person shall treat any animal with any material or substance nor in any manner for the purpose of preventing normal reaction on the part of the animal to any diagnostic test. No person shall knowingly sell or offer for sale any animal that has reacted positively to any USDA approved official tuberculosis test or the blood test for brucellosis. No animal that has reacted to any USDA approved official tuberculosis test other test shall be sold or removed from the premises where the test was made without permission, in writing, from the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-8

; P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 1.

4-9-9.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation willfully and knowingly violating subsections

4-9-2(b)

or

4-9-3(b)

shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person, firm or corporation willfully and knowingly violating §

4-9-8

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), or by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both for the first offense; and not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both, for each subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-9

; P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 1.

4-9-10.
Prosecution of violations.

It is the duty of the attorney general and his or her assistants to prosecute all persons accused of violating the provisions of this chapter and to defend in all cases of appeals from appraisements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1358, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-9-10

.

4-9-11.
Federal approval of vaccines required.

No vaccine or other biological product prepared for the purpose of immunizing animals shall be used in the state unless that product has been approved for that use by the center of veterinary biologics of the U.S. department of agriculture.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 228, § 1.